Utah statutes.
59-7-208.   Provisions followed for purposes of tax collected.

For the purposes of the taxes collected under this part, and interest and penalties arising in connection therewith, the provisions of Section 59-7-532 shall be followed.



Amended by Chapter 169, 1993 General Session

